Maryland, session 2026, HB0623.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–129.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Military–connected student” means a student who is a dependent of:
(i) [An active duty uniformed services member;
– 1 –

Ch. 670 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) A member of a reserve component] A SERVICE MEMBER; or
[(iii)] (II) A SERVICE member [described in item (i) or (ii) of this
paragraph] who was killed in the line of duty.
(3) “Program” means the Purple Star Schools Program.
10–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Commission” means the Maryland Higher Education Commission.
(h) (1) “Institution of higher education” means an institution of postsecondary
education that generally limits enrollment to graduates of secondary schools, and awards
degrees at either the associate, baccalaureate, or graduate level.
(2) “Institution of higher education” includes public, private nonprofit, and
for–profit institutions of higher education.
(i) (1) “Institution of postsecondary education” means a school or other
institution that offers an educational program in the State for individuals who are at least
16 years old and who have graduated from or left elementary or secondary school.
(2) “Institution of postsecondary education” does not include:
(i) Any adult education, evening high school, or high school
equivalence program conducted by a public school system of the State; or
(ii) Any apprenticeship or on–the–job training program subject to
approval by the Apprenticeship and Training Council.
(j) “Private career school” means a privately owned and privately operated
institution of postsecondary education other than an institution of higher education that
furnishes or offers to furnish programs, whether or not requiring a payment of tuition or
fee, for the purpose of training, retraining, or upgrading individuals for gainful employment
as skilled or semiskilled workers or technicians in recognized occupations or in new and
emerging occupations.
SUBTITLE 20. PURPLE STAR COLLEGES PROGRAM.
11–2001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 670
(B) “COLLEGE” MEANS:
(1) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION; OR
(2) A PRIVATE CAREER SCHOOL.
(C) “MILITARY–CONNECTED STUDENT” MEANS A STUDENT WHO IS:
(1) A SERVICE MEMBER;
(2) A VETERAN; OR
(3) A SPOUSE OR DEPENDENT OF AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN ITEM
(1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE PURPLE STAR COLLEGES PROGRAM.
11–2002.
(A) THERE IS A PURPLE STAR COLLEGES PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO RECOGNIZE COLLEGES THAT
PROVIDE STRONG SERVICES AND SUPPORT FOR MILITARY–CONNECTED STUDENTS.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
11–2003.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION
SHALL DESIGNATE A COLLEGE AS A PURPLE STAR COLLEGE IF THE COLLEGE
APPLIES AND MEETS THE CRITERIA ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION FOR A PURPLE
STAR COLLEGE.
(B) AT A MINIMUM, THE COMMISSION’S CRITERIA FOR A PURPLE STAR
COLLEGE SHALL REQUIRE A COLLEGE TO:
(1) DESIGNATE A STAFF MEMBER AS A UNIFORMED SERVICES
LIAISON, WHOSE DUTIES SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) IDENTIFYING MILITARY–CONNECTED STUDENTS WHO ARE
NEWLY ENROLLED AT THE COLLEGE;
– 3 –

Ch. 670 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) SERVING AS THE POINT OF CONTACT BETWEEN THE
COLLEGE AND NEWLY ENROLLED MILITARY–CONNECTED STUDENTS;
(III) DETERMINING APPROPRIATE COLLEGE SERVICES
AVAILABLE TO NEWLY ENROLLED MILITARY–CONNECTED STUDENTS;
(IV) ASSISTING IN COORDINATING COLLEGE PROGRAMS FOR
NEWLY ENROLLED MILITARY–CONNECTED STUDENTS; AND
(V) GENERALLY ASSISTING IN A MILITARY–CONNECTED
STUDENT’S TRANSITION TO A NEW COLLEGE;
(2) ESTABLISH ON THE COLLEGE’S WEBSITE AN EASILY ACCESSIBLE
WEBPAGE THAT INCLUDES LINKS TO RESOURCES FOR MILITARY–CONNECTED
STUDENTS, INCLUDING LINKS TO INFORMATION REGARDING:
(I) RELOCATION TO, ENROLLMENT AT, REGISTRATION AT, AND
TRANSFERRING RECORDS TO THE COLLEGE;
(II) ACADEMIC PLANNING, COURSE SEQUENCES, AND
ADVANCED COURSES AVAILABLE AT THE COLLEGE; AND
(III) COUNSELING AND OTHER SUPPORT SERVICES AVAILABLE
FOR MILITARY–CONNECTED STUDENTS TRANSITIONING INTO THE COLLEGE;
(3) MAINTAIN A TRANSITION PROGRAM LED BY STUDENTS, IF
APPROPRIATE, THAT ASSISTS MILITARY–CONNECTED STUDENTS ENROLLED AT THE
COLLEGE; AND
(4) OFFER PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT FOR STAFF MEMBERS ON
ISSUES RELATED TO MILITARY–CONNECTED STUDENTS TRANSFERRING TO NEW
COLLEGES.
(C) A COLLEGE MAY PARTNER WITH ITS GOVERNING BODY TO FULFILL THE
COMMISSION’S CRITERIA TO QUALIFY AS A PURPLE STAR COLLEGE.
(D) THE COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND COLLEGE
COLLABORATION FOR STUDENT VETERANS COMMISSION, SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 670
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 5 –